Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3029.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 45-2 of the General Laws entitled "General Powers" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
45-2-71. Regulation of powered landscape equipment.
(a) Except as provided in subsections (d) and (e) of this section, and notwithstanding any
provision of a municipal charter, ordinance, rule, or regulation to the contrary, no city or town shall
enact or enforce any ordinance or regulation that prohibits, bans, or otherwise restricts the sale,
purchase, ownership, or use of powered landscape equipment, based solely upon the type of fuel
or power source used in the operation of such equipment.
(b) For purposes of this section, “powered landscape equipment” shall include, but not be
limited to, leaf blowers, lawn mowers, string trimmers, hedge trimmers, edgers, and similar outdoor
maintenance equipment, whether powered by gasoline, diesel, electricity, battery, or other energy
source.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a city or town from adopting or
enforcing:
(1) Reasonable, content-neutral noise regulations of general applicability;
(2) Restrictions on hours of operation applicable to all powered equipment; or
(3) Regulations necessary to address public safety concerns, provided such regulations do
not effectively prohibit the use of powered landscape equipment based on fuel type.
(d) No municipality shall adopt any changes in their regulation of power equipment,

including a change in what type of power equipment can be used within its jurisdiction unless the
changes have been approved by a majority of those voting in the municipality's referendum.
(e) Grandfathering. Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, any ordinance or
regulation of a city or town that was duly adopted and in effect prior to the effective date of this
section and that prohibits or restricts powered landscape equipment, based on fuel or power source,
including any municipal ban, shall remain valid and enforceable within that municipality; provided
that, such ordinance or regulation is not amended, expanded, or reenacted after the effective date
of this section.
(f) Any ordinance or regulation adopted, amended, expanded, or reenacted concerning the
use of power equipment after the effective date of this section, that is inconsistent with the
provisions herein shall be deemed null and void.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005253
========
LC005253 - Page 2 of 3